Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-1504
Election contest; qualifications challenge.

(1) An election contest pursuant to the Legislative Qualifications and Election Contests Act shall only determine which candidate was properly elected to the Legislature and is entitled to be seated. The election contest shall place in issue only the validity of the results of the election.

(2) A qualifications challenge pursuant to the act shall only determine whether a person elected to the Legislature is qualified to hold or retain the seat for which elected. The qualifications challenge shall place in issue only the qualifications of the person elected as a member of the Legislature under the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2018, LB744, § 11.